Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1246.03
Student loans; Nebraska State Colleges; service loans; security.

The Nebraska Investment Council may negotiate with the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges for the servicing of such loans which may be purchased by the council, retained in its investment portfolio or resold as provided in section 72-1246.02. The council may require such security for the performance of the servicing duties as it may deem necessary to insure full compliance with a servicing agreement.

Laws 1971, LB 152, § 4.